zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品 > 壁装插座板/开关面板: 空白壁装插座板; 插座盖; 拨动开关面板
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet > Peitelevyt: Tyhjät peitelevyt; Pistorasiasuojat; Kytkinlevyt
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf > Wandplatten: Leere Wandplatten; Steckdosenkappen; Kippschalterplatten
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie > Nástenné platničky a kryty: Prázdne nástenné platničky; Kryty zásuviek; Vypínače
tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri > Duvar Plakaları ve Kaplamaları: Boş Duvar Plakaları; Priz Kapakları; Anahtar Plakaları
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden > Afdekramen voor muurcontactdozen en -schakelaars: Blinde afdekramen voor muurcontactdozen en -schakelaars; Afdekramen voor stekkercontactdozen; Afdekramen voor tuimelschakelaars
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า > เพลทและฝาบ็อกซ์ไฟ: แผ่นผนังเปล่า; ฝาครอบปลั๊กไฟ; แผ่นสวิตช์สลับ
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema > Stenske plošče in pokrovi: Prazne stenske plošče; Zaščitni pokrovčki za vtičnice; Plošče za preklopna stikala
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα > Πλάκες & καλύμματα τοίχου: Κενές πλάκες τοίχου; Καλύμματα πρίζας; Πλάκες διακοπτών εναλλαγής
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek > Fali lemezek és burkolatok: Üres fallemezek; Dugaszolóaljzat-fedelek; Kapcsolólemezek
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne > Płyty ścienne: Gładkie płyty ścienne; Osłony gniazdek; Przełączniki płytkowe
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện > Vách chắn và nắp ốp tường cho công tắc/ổ cắm: Tấm ốp tường trống; Nắp ổ cắm; Tấm công tắc lật
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr > Veggplater og -deksler: Blanke veggplater; Stikkontaktdeksler; Vippebryterplater
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos > Espelhos para tomadas e interruptores: Espelho de parede branco; Tampas de soquete de tomada; Espelho de interruptor
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica > Tampas e placas de parede: Placas de parede em branco; Tampas de tomadas; Placas de interruptor de alternância
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置 > スイッチ・コンセントプレート: ブランクウォールプレート; プラグソケットカバー; トグルスイッチプレート
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques > Plaques murales: Plaques murales vierges; Cache-prise; Plaques d’interrupteurs
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche > Placche a muro e coperture: Placche a muro vuote; Coperture per prese di corrente; Piastre per interruttori a levetta
sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör > Täckramar: Blanka väggplattor; Stickproppsskydd; Växlingsomkopplarplattor
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品 > 插座蓋板: 空白蓋板; 插頭插座蓋; 撥動開關板
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys > Sieninės plokštelės ir dangteliai: Tuščios sieninės plokštelės; Kištukinių lizdų dangteliai; Jungiklių plokštelės
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи > Рамки и капаци за стенни ключове и контакти: Рамки за стенни ключове и контакти; Капаци за контакти; Рамки за превключватели
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice > Plăci și capace de perete: Plăci de perete goale; Capace pentru prize; Plăci pentru întrerupătoare basculante
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace > Elektroinstalační nástěnné rámečky a kryty: Prázdné elektroinstalační nástěnné rámečky; Kryty zásuvek; Vypínače
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения > Рамки и крышки для розеток и выключателей: Крышки для монтажных коробок; Заглушки и крышки для розеток; Рамки для выключателей
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema > Zidne ploče i pokrovi: Prazne zidne ploče; Poklopci za utičnice; Ploče za prekidače
es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos > Placas de pared: Placas de pared en blanco; Cubiertas para enchufes; Placas de interruptor de palanca
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr > Afdækninger til elektriske kontakter: Blanke vægplader; Afdækninger til stikdåser; Skiftekontaktplader
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품 > 월플레이트/월플레이트 커버: 맹플레이트; 콘센트 구멍마개; 토글 스위치 플레이트
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies > Wall Plates & Covers: Blank Wall Plates; Plug Socket Covers; Toggle Switch Plates